Missouri, session 2026, SB1152.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 77.450, 115.121, 115.124, 162.1060,
184.352, 233.040, 247.060, 247.180, 249.150, 321.210, and
321.610, RSMo, are repealed and twelve new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 77.450, 115.121, 115.124,
115.710, 162.1060, 184.352, 233.040, 247.060, 247.180, 249.150,
321.210, and 321.610, to read as follows:
77.450. If a vacancy occurs in any elective office
other than the office of mayor, a successor to the vacant
office shall be selected by appointment by the mayor with
the advice and consent of a majority of the remaining
members of the council. The council may adopt procedures to
fill vacancies consistent with this section. The successor
shall serve until the next [available regular] general
municipal [April] election day, as described in section
115.121. If a vacancy occurs in any office not elective,
the mayor shall appoint a suitable person to discharge the
duties of the same until the first regular meeting of the
council thereafter, at which time the vacancy shall be
permanently filled.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1152 2
115.121. 1. The general election day shall be the
first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of even-
numbered years.
2. The primary election day shall be the first Tuesday
after the first Monday in August of even-numbered years.
3. The election day for the election of political
subdivision and special district officers and for a ballot
measure submitted solely to the qualified voters of a
particular political subdivision or special district shall
be the first Tuesday after the first Monday in [April]
November each year, and shall be known as the general
municipal election day.
115.124. 1. Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, in a nonpartisan election in any [political
subdivision or] special district [including municipal
elections in any city, town, or village] with two thousand
or fewer inhabitants that have adopted a proposal pursuant
to subsection 3 of this section [but excluding municipal
elections in any city, town, or village with more than two
thousand inhabitants], if the notice provided for in
subsection 5 of section 115.127 has been published in at
least one newspaper of general circulation as defined in
section 493.050 in the district, and if the number of
candidates for each office in [a particular political
subdivision,] the special district[, or municipality] is
equal to the number of positions for each office within the
[political subdivision,] special district[, or municipality]
to be filled by the election and no ballot measure is placed
on the ballot such that a particular political subdivision
will owe no proportional elections costs if an election is
not held, no election shall be held, and the candidates
shall assume the responsibilities of their offices at the

SB 1152 3
same time and in the same manner as if they had been
elected. If no election is held for a particular [political
subdivision,] special district[, or municipality] as
provided in this section, the election authority shall
publish a notice containing the names of the candidates that
shall assume the responsibilities of office under this
section. Such notice shall be published in at least one
newspaper of general circulation as defined in section
493.050 in such [political subdivision or] district by the
first of the month in which the election would have
occurred, had it been contested. Notwithstanding any other
provision of law to the contrary, if at any election the
number of candidates filing for a particular office exceeds
the number of positions to be filled at such election, the
election authority shall hold the election as scheduled,
even if a sufficient number of candidates withdraw from such
contest for that office so that the number of candidates
remaining after the filing deadline is equal to the number
of positions to be filled.
2. The election authority or political subdivision
responsible for the oversight of the filing of candidates in
any nonpartisan election in any [political subdivision or]
special district shall clearly designate where candidates
shall form a line to effectuate such filings and determine
the order of such filings; except that, in the case of
candidates who file a declaration of candidacy with the
election authority or political subdivision prior to 5:00
p.m. on the first day for filing, the election authority or
political subdivision may determine by random drawing the
order in which such candidates' names shall appear on the
ballot. If a drawing is conducted pursuant to this
subsection, it shall be conducted so that each candidate, or

SB 1152 4
candidate's representative if the candidate filed under
subsection 2 of section 115.355, may draw a number at random
at the time of filing. If such drawing is conducted, the
election authority or political subdivision shall record the
number drawn with the candidate's declaration of candidacy.
If such drawing is conducted, the names of candidates filing
on the first day of filing for each office on each ballot
shall be listed in ascending order of the numbers so drawn.
3. The governing body of any city, town, or village
with two thousand or fewer inhabitants may submit to the
voters at any available election, a question to adopt the
provisions of subsection 1 of this section for [municipal]
special district elections. If a majority of the votes cast
by the qualified voters voting thereon are in favor of the
question, then the city, town, or village shall conduct
[nonpartisan municipal] elections as provided in subsection
1 of this section for all nonpartisan elections remaining in
the year in which the proposal was adopted and for the six
calendar years immediately following such approval. At the
end of such six-year period, each such [city, town, or
village] special district shall be prohibited from
conducting such elections in such a manner unless such a
question is again adopted by the majority of qualified
voters as provided in this subsection.
115.710. 1. Each declaration of candidacy for any
city, town, or village office, or any township office in a
township organization county shall state the candidate's
full name, residence address, office for which such
candidate proposes to be a candidate, the party ticket on
which he or she wishes to be a candidate, and that if
elected he or she will qualify. The declaration shall be in
substantially the following form:

SB 1152 5
I, ______, a resident and registered voter of
the county of ______ and the state of Missouri,
residing at ______, do announce myself a
candidate for the office of ______ on the ______
party ticket, to be voted for at the general
municipal election to be held on the ______ day
of ______, ______, and I further declare that if
elected to such office I will qualify.
__________________ Subscribed and sworn
Signature of to before me this
candidate
______ day of
______, ______
__________________ __________________
Residence address Signature of election
official or other officer
authorized to
administer oaths
__________________
Mailing address (if different)
__________________
Telephone Number (Optional)
2. If the declaration is to be filed in person, it
shall be subscribed and sworn to by the candidate before an
official authorized to accept his or her declaration of
candidacy. If the declaration is to be filed by certified
mail or any other means, it shall be subscribed and sworn to

SB 1152 6
by the candidate before a notary public or other officer
authorized by law to administer oaths.
162.1060. 1. There is hereby established a
"Metropolitan Schools Achieving Value in Transfer
Corporation", which shall be a public body corporate, for
the purpose of implementing an urban voluntary school
transfer program within a program area which shall include a
city not within a county and any school district located in
whole or in part in a county with a population in excess of
nine hundred thousand persons which district chooses to
participate. The corporation shall be governed by a board
of directors consisting of one representative from each
school district that participates in the urban voluntary
school transfer program selected by the governing body of
each such district. The vote of each member of the board
shall be weighted proportionately to the percentage of the
total of transfer students who attend school in the member's
district.
2. (1) The corporation's board of directors shall
design and operate an urban voluntary school transfer
program for all participating districts. The board shall
make provision for transportation of all the students and
for payment to school districts for the education of such
students. Acceptance of students into the program shall be
determined by policies enacted by the corporation's board of
directors, provided that first preference for acceptance of
students shall be granted to students currently attending a
district other than the district of residence pursuant to a
voluntary transfer program established pursuant to federal
desegregation order, decree or agreement. All provisions of
this section shall be subject to a settlement incorporated
into a final judgment, provided that the financial

SB 1152 7
provisions of this section shall not be superseded by such
settlement.
(2) Each district, other than a metropolitan school
district, participating in an urban voluntary school
transfer program shall place before voters in the district a
proposal to continue participation in the urban voluntary
school transfer program at the [April election] general
municipal election day, as described in section 115.121,
during the sixth year of operation of the program. Unless a
majority of district voters voting thereon votes to continue
participation in the program, each district, other than a
metropolitan school district, shall file a plan, no later
than the end of the seventh year of the operation of the
program, for phase-out of the district's participation in
the program, and such plan shall be provided to the state
board of education, the transitional school district and the
board of directors of the corporation. Each such plan shall
provide for elimination of transfers to the district
pursuant to this section no later than the following
schedule:
(a) The ninth year of the program for grades one
through three;
(b) The tenth year of the program for grades four
through six;
(c) The eleventh year of the program for grades seven
through nine; and
(d) The twelfth year of the program for grades ten
through twelve.
3. (1) Other provisions of law to the contrary
notwithstanding, each student participating in the program
shall be considered an eligible pupil of the district of
residence for the purpose of distributing state aid, except

SB 1152 8
that students attending school in a metropolitan school
district in a program established pursuant to this section
shall be considered eligible pupils of the district
attended, and provided that the department shall determine
the increased state aid eligibility created by including
pupils attending school in a program established pursuant to
this section as eligible pupils of the district of residence
and shall distribute the full amount of such state aid to
the metropolitan schools achieving value in transfer
corporation and shall not distribute state aid on the basis
of such pupils to the district of residence.
(2) For each student participating in the program, the
corporation shall receive the total of all state and federal
aid that would otherwise be paid to the student's district
of residence, including, but not limited to, state aid
provided pursuant to section 148.360, section 149.015, and
sections 163.031 and 163.087. The corporation shall pay a
school district that receives a nonresident student from the
funds of the corporation in accordance with the provisions
of this section and agreements between the corporation and
the participating school districts.
4. (1) In each of the first two fiscal years, the
corporation shall also receive a payment of twenty-five
million dollars.
(2) For the third year of operation and thereafter,
the corporation shall receive transportation state aid, for
each student that participates in the program, which shall
be in the same amount and on the same basis as would be
received by the student's district of residence if the
student were attending a school in the attendance zone in
the student's district of residence, provided that such
reimbursement shall not exceed one hundred fifty-five

SB 1152 9
percent of the statewide average per pupil cost for
transportation for the second preceding school year.
(3) Funds received by the corporation pursuant to this
subsection may be used for any purpose and need not be
expended in the year received.
100 5. The corporation created herein shall have all
101 powers of a public body corporate, except that it shall have
102 no paid employees. The corporation, by contract with any
103 public entity, school district, or private entity, may
104 retain the services of a fiscal agent, make provisions for
105 accounting, transportation management, or other assistance
106 that the corporation may need to carry out its functions,
107 except that no contractor or employee of any contractor
108 acting in a policy-making function shall have ever have been
109 a contractor or employee of the voluntary interdistrict
110 coordinating council or any other program established by the
111 federal district court; except that this restriction shall
112 not apply to transportation contractors or their employees.
113 When a school district located in whole or in part in a
114 county with a population in excess of nine hundred thousand
115 persons ceases to participate in the urban public school
116 transfer program, its representative shall be removed from
117 the corporation's board of directors. When none of the
118 students who reside in a school district in a city not
119 within a county opt to participate in the program, the
120 school district's representative shall be removed from the
121 board of directors. When all of the school districts have
122 ended their participation in the program, in accordance with
123 this subsection, the corporation's operations shall cease,
124 and any funds of the corporation remaining shall be paid to
125 the state of Missouri to the credit of the general revenue
126 fund, except such amounts as the commissioner of education

SB 1152 10
127 shall determine should be paid to particular school
128 districts under the regulations applicable to federal
129 programs or returned to the federal government.
130 6. All funds received by the corporation shall become
131 funds of the corporation and paid for the purposes set forth
132 in this section and in accordance with agreements entered
133 into between the corporation and participating school
134 districts and other entities, provided that funds received
135 for particular purposes, under federal or state categorical
136 programs benefitting individual students, shall be paid to
137 the district or entity providing services to the students
138 entitled to such services. The proportionate share of
139 federal and state resources generated by students with
140 disabilities, or the staff serving them, shall be paid to
141 the district where the child is attending school, unless the
142 district of residence is required by law to provide such
143 services to the individual students, except that a special
144 school district containing the district where the child is
145 attending school shall be paid for all unreimbursed expenses
146 for special education services provided to students with
147 disabilities. Funds held by the corporation at the close of
148 a fiscal year may be carried over and utilized by the
149 corporation in subsequent fiscal years for the purposes set
150 forth in this section.
151 7. The board of directors may establish regional
152 attendance zones which map the regions of a district in a
153 city not within a county to corresponding recipient
154 districts within the remainder of the program area. In
155 establishing the regional attendance zones, the board of
156 directors may solicit comments and suggestions from
157 residents of the program area and may adopt one or more
158 regional attendance zones previously established in the

SB 1152 11
159 program area pursuant to a federal court desegregation
160 order, decree or agreement.
184.352. The following terms whenever used or referred
to in sections 184.350 to 184.384 shall unless a different
intent clearly appears from the context be construed to have
the following meaning:
(1) "African-American history museum and cultural
subdistrict" shall consist of a political subdistrict which
shall provide for the collection, preservation, and
exhibition of items relating to the history and culture of
African-Americans, more specifically for interpretation
through core exhibits that may include wax sculptures,
photographs, paintings, and other artistic expressions; and
further for the collection of costumes, archaeological
anthropological material, artifacts, and memorabilia; and
for the maintenance of archives, including manuscripts,
personal records, and other material that relates to the
African-American experience to American history; and to
provide for the preservation of American music traditions,
including ragtime, jazz, blues, and gospel; and to provide
technical assistance and advisory service for historic
research or which may contract with another person with the
capability of providing such services;
(2) "Art museum subdistrict" shall consist of such
institutions and places for the purpose of collection and
exhibition of pictures, statuary and other works of art and
whatever else may be of artistic interest and appropriate
for exhibition in an art gallery or museum for instruction
in art and in general for the promotion by all proper means
of aesthetic or artistic education;
(3) "Board", the governing body of the metropolitan
zoological park and museum district;

SB 1152 12
(4) "Botanical garden subdistrict" shall consist of a
political subdistrict which shall provide for the collection
and exhibition of displays of things relating to plants or
botany, for the promotion of plant life and related
subjects, educational and research activities, for the
maintenance of a botanical library, and for the promotion by
all proper means of public interest in plant life and
botany; or which may contract with another person with the
capability of providing such services;
(5) "City", a constitutional charter city not located
within a county;
(6) "Commission", the governing body of each of the
respective subdistricts as may be authorized as provided in
section 184.350, 184.351, or 184.353;
(7) "County", a constitutional charter county
adjoining a constitutional charter city;
(8) "District", the metropolitan zoological park and
museum district;
(9) "Missouri history museum subdistrict" shall
consist of a political subdistrict which shall provide for
the collection, preservation, and exhibition of items
relating to the history of the entire state of Missouri and
of the Louisiana Purchase Territory, and more specifically
for the collection and display of photographs, paintings,
costumes, archaeological and anthropological material,
artifacts and memorabilia pertaining to the political,
commercial and cultural history of the region, including
extensive artifacts, memorabilia, historical documents
concerning the first solo transatlantic flight, for the
promotion of archaeological and historical studies, for the
maintenance of a history library and archives, including
manuscripts documenting the first United States-sponsored

SB 1152 13
exploratory expedition of the Louisiana Purchase Territory
as well as papers of the president who authorized the
Louisiana Purchase, and for the promotion by all proper
means of public interest in the history of Missouri and the
region in which it is located, and, as otherwise provided by
law and in cooperation with the department of natural
resources of the state of Missouri, to provide technical
assistance and advisory services for the collection,
preservation, and exhibition of recordings, instruments, and
memorabilia of ragtime, jazz and blues music including
ragtime pianos and ragtime piano sheet music to be housed
and maintained at the Scott Joplin house state historic
site; or which may contract with another person having all
of the historical materials listed herein as well as the
capability of providing all of the services listed herein;
(10) "Recreation and amateur sports subdistrict" shall
consist of a political subdistrict which shall provide for
and assist in the planning, development, financing,
maintenance, improvement and construction of facilities and
venues to be publicly owned and operated by political
subdivisions, public school districts, universities and
colleges, or not-for-profit corporations chartered to
attract, promote and manage major national and international
amateur sports events, competitions and programs for the use
of the general public. Such subdistrict shall structure its
procedures for procuring supplies, services and construction
to achieve the result that a minimum of twenty percent in
the aggregate of the total dollar value of annual
procurements is made directly or indirectly from certified
socially and economically disadvantaged small business
concerns;

SB 1152 14
(11) "St. Louis Science Center subdistrict" shall
consist of such institutions and places for the purpose of
collection and exhibition of displays of items of natural
historical, industrial, transport and scientific interest,
the instruction and recreation of the people, for the
promotion of the study of science, industrial, transport and
100 natural history and kindred subjects and for the promotion
101 by all proper means of public interest in natural history,
102 transport, industry and science;
103 (12) "Special election", [an election held on the
104 first Tuesday of April] the general municipal election day,
105 as described in section 115.121, or whenever propositions
106 are submitted to the voters of the whole district;
107 (13) "Symphony orchestra subdistrict" shall consist of
108 a political subdistrict which shall provide for regular
109 performances of a symphony orchestra with not less than
110 ninety full-time symphonic musicians, own its own concert
111 hall in which a substantial number of its concerts shall be
112 held, and provide for the promotion by all proper means of
113 public interest in music; or which may contract with another
114 person with the capability of providing such services and
115 which owns it own concert hall;
116 (14) "Transport museum subdistrict" shall consist of a
117 political subdistrict which shall provide for institutions
118 and places for the edification of the public in the history
119 and science of transportation, communications and powering,
120 and more specifically for the preservation and display of
121 artifacts related to man's efforts to transport materials,
122 people, and ideas and to create, transmit, and utilize
123 power, and for the provision of a library of publications
124 and other records containing history and technology related
125 to transportation, communications and powering, and

SB 1152 15
126 facilities for the study of such efforts; or which may
127 contract with another person with the capability of
128 providing such services;
129 (15) "Zoological subdistrict" shall consist of such
130 institutions and places for the collection and exhibition of
131 animals and animal life, for the instruction and recreation
132 of the people, for the promotion of zoology and kindred
133 subjects, for the encouragement of zoological study and
134 research and for the increase of public interest in wild
135 animals and in the protection of wild animal life.
233.040. 1. The mayor and members of the city council
of any city or town within any special road district thus
organized, together with the members of the county
commission of the county in which said district is located,
at a meeting to be held in the meeting place of the county
commission, at which meeting the presiding commissioner of
the county commission shall preside and the county clerk
shall act as clerk, within two weeks after the voters within
the territory of such proposed district shall adopt the
provisions of sections 233.010 to 233.165, shall, by order
of record to be kept by the county clerk, appoint a board of
commissioners composed of three persons, designating one to
serve for three years, one for two years and one for one
year, and in February every year thereafter one special road
district commissioner shall be appointed as above specified,
to serve for three years. However, beginning in 1994, the
commissioner whose appointment will expire in February,
1994, shall serve until the first Tuesday in April of that
year at which time a commissioner shall be elected to hold
office for three years and until a successor is elected,
commissioned, and qualified. Those commissioners whose
terms expire in 1995 or 1996 shall serve until the first

SB 1152 16
Tuesday in April in 1995 or 1996, respectively, at which
time a commissioner shall be elected to hold office for
three years and until a successor is elected, commissioned,
and qualified to replace each commissioner. All subsequent
commissioners shall be elected at the [appropriate] general
municipal election [held on the first Tuesday in April] day,
as described in section 115.121, for three-year terms. An
appointee shall be eligible to file for election as
commissioner. The nominations and elections shall be
governed by the provisions of law relating to the nomination
and election of persons on a nonpartisan basis at such
elections. All such commissioners shall be resident
taxpayers of the district, and shall serve until their
successors are appointed or elected and qualified, with
vacancies to be filled by the county commission.
Resignations shall be to the county clerk. Removal from the
district shall create a vacancy.
2. Such commissioners, before entering upon the
discharge of their duties, shall take oath of office, to be
administered by the clerk of the county commission.
247.060. 1. The management of the business and
affairs of the district is hereby vested in a board of
directors, who shall have all the powers conferred upon the
district except as herein otherwise provided. It shall be
composed of five members, each of whom shall be a voter of
the district and shall have resided in said district one
whole year immediately prior to his or her election. A
member shall be at least twenty-five years of age and shall
not be delinquent in the payment of taxes at the time of his
election. Except as provided in subsection 2 of this
section, the term of office of a member of the board shall
be three years. The remaining members of the board shall

SB 1152 17
appoint a qualified person to fill any vacancy on the
board. If no qualified person who lives in the subdistrict
for which there is a vacancy is willing to serve on the
board, the board may appoint an otherwise qualified person
who lives in the district but not in the subdistrict in
which the vacancy exists to fill such vacancy.
2. After notification by certified mail that he or she
has two consecutive unexcused absences, any member of the
board failing to attend the meetings of the board for three
consecutive regular meetings, unless excused by the board
for reasons satisfactory to the board, shall be deemed to
have vacated the seat, and the secretary of the board shall
certify that fact to the board. The vacancy shall be filled
as other vacancies occurring in the board.
3. The initial members of the board shall be appointed
by the circuit court and one shall serve until the
immediately following first Tuesday after the first Monday
in April, two shall serve until the first Tuesday after the
first Monday in April on the second year following their
appointment and the remaining appointees shall serve until
the first Tuesday after the first Monday in April on the
third year following their appointment. On the expiration
of such terms and on the expiration of any subsequent term,
elections shall be held as otherwise provided by law, and
such elections shall be held [in April] pursuant to section
247.180.
4. In 2008, 2009, and 2010, directors elected in such
years shall serve from the first Tuesday after the first
Monday in June until the first Tuesday in April of the third
year following the year of their election. All directors
elected thereafter shall serve from the first Tuesday in

SB 1152 18
April until the first Tuesday in April of the third year
following the year of their election.
5. Each member of the board may receive an attendance
fee not to exceed one hundred dollars for attending each
regularly called board meeting, or special meeting, but
shall not be paid for attending more than two meetings in
any calendar month, except that in a county of the first
classification, a member shall not be paid for attending
more than four meetings in any calendar month. However, no
board member shall be paid more than one attendance fee if
such member attends more than one board meeting in a
calendar week. In addition, the president of the board of
directors may receive fifty dollars for attending each
regularly or specially called board meeting, but shall not
be paid the additional fee for attending more than two
meetings in any calendar month. Each member of the board
shall be reimbursed for his or her actual expenditures in
the performance of his or her duties on behalf of the
district.
6. In no event, however, shall a board member receive
any attendance fees or additional compensation authorized in
subsection 5 of this section until after such board member
has completed a minimum of six hours training regarding the
responsibilities of the board and its members concerning the
basics of water treatment and distribution, budgeting and
rates, water utility planning, the funding of capital
improvements, the understanding of water utility financial
statements, the Missouri sunshine law, and this chapter.
7. The circuit court of the county having jurisdiction
over the district shall have jurisdiction over the members
of the board of directors to suspend any member from
exercising his or her office, whensoever it appears that he

SB 1152 19
or she has abused his or her trust or become disqualified;
to remove any member upon proof or conviction of gross
misconduct or disqualification for his or her office; or to
restrain and prevent any alienation of property of the
district by members, in cases where it is threatened, or
there is good reason to apprehend that it is intended to be
made in fraud of the rights and interests of the district.
8. The jurisdiction conferred by this section shall be
exercised as in ordinary cases upon petition, filed by or at
the instance of any member of the board, or at the instance
of any ten voters residing in the district who join in the
petition, verified by the affidavit of at least one of
them. The petition shall be heard in a summary manner after
ten days' notice in writing to the member or officer
complained of. An appeal shall lie from the judgment of the
circuit court as in other causes, and shall be speedily
determined; but an appeal does not operate under any
condition as a supersedeas of a judgment of suspension or
removal from office.
247.180. 1. Regular elections and elections held for
the purposes of section 247.130 shall be called annually by
the board of directors on the [first Tuesday after the first
Monday in April] general municipal election day, as
described in section 115.121. Such elections shall be
conducted by the appropriate election authority pursuant to
chapter 115.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if
there is only one candidate for the post of director of any
given subdistrict, then no election shall be held, and the
candidate or candidates shall assume the responsibilities of
their offices at the same time and in the same manner as if
elected. If there is no candidate for the post of any given

SB 1152 20
subdistrict, then no election shall be held for that post
and it shall be considered vacant, to be filled pursuant to
the provisions of section 247.060.
249.150. On the [first Tuesday in April] general
municipal election day, as described in section 115.121,
after the expiration of two years from the date of the
election of the first board of trustees for respective terms
of two, four and six years each, an election shall be called
and held by the board of trustees and every two years
thereafter shall be so called and held for the purpose of
electing a trustee who shall serve for a term of six years
and until his successor shall have been elected and
qualified to fill the office of the trustee whose term may
then expire and any vacancy then existing in the membership
of said board shall be filled at such election.
321.210. On the [first Tuesday in April after the
expiration of at least two full calendar years from the date
of the election of the first board of directors, and on the
first Tuesday in April] general municipal election day, as
described in section 115.121, every two years [thereafter],
an election for members of the board of directors shall be
held in the district. Nominations shall be filed at the
headquarters of the fire protection district in which a
majority of the district is located by paying a filing fee
equal to the amount of a candidate for county office as set
forth under section 115.357 and filing a statement under
oath that the candidate possesses the required
qualifications. The candidate receiving the most votes
shall be elected. Any new member of the board shall qualify
in the same manner as the members of the first board qualify.
321.610. 1. In addition to all other limits set forth
in this chapter, the board in counties of the first

SB 1152 21
classification shall in each year determine the amount of
money necessary to be raised by taxation, and shall fix a
rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of the
taxable tangible property within the district as shown by
the last completed assessment, and with other revenues, will
raise the amount required by the district annually to supply
funds for paying the expenses of organization and operation
and the costs of acquiring, supplying and maintaining the
property, works and equipment of the district, and maintain
the necessary personnel, which rate of levy shall not exceed
forty cents on the one hundred dollars valuation. The board
in any county of the first classification having a
population in excess of nine hundred thousand may fix an
additional rate not to exceed twenty-five cents on the
hundred dollars valuation and the board in all other first
classification counties may fix an additional rate, not to
exceed fifteen cents on the hundred dollars valuation, the
revenues from which shall be deposited in a special fund and
used only for the pension program of the district, by
submitting the following question to the voters at the
municipal general, primary or general election in such
district or at any election at which a member of the board
of directors is to be elected:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire
Protection District be authorized to levy an
annual tax rate of ______ cents per one hundred
dollars valuation, the revenues from which shall
be deposited in a special fund and used only for
the pension program of the district?
2. Any district approving a tax levy rate pursuant to
the provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall
transfer all revenue collected plus interest monthly for

SB 1152 22
deposit in the district retirement fund. The board of
directors for the fire protection district shall comply with
the prudent investor standard for investment fiduciaries as
provided in section 105.688 when investing the assets of the
pension program.
3. Any district may impose a tax not to exceed ten
cents on the one hundred dollars valuation, in addition to
the rate which the board may levy pursuant to this section,
by submitting the following question to the voters at any
election in such district held on the [first Tuesday in
April] general municipal election day, as described in
section 115.121, of any year:
Shall the board of directors of ______ Fire
District be authorized to increase the annual
tax rate from ______ cents to ______ cents on
the hundred dollars assessed valuation?
and in addition thereto, to fix a rate of levy which will
enable it to promptly pay in full when due all interest on
and principal of bonds and other obligations of the
district, and to pay any indebtedness authorized by a vote
of the people as provided by sections 321.010 to 321.450;
and in the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies in the
bonded or contractual indebtedness, an additional levy may
be made as provided in section 321.260.
✓